Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 3. Board of Directors Generally

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-740.
Appointment and qualifications; number; term; election of successors; vacancies; bond.

Within thirty (30) days after entering the decree incorporating said district, the court shall appoint a board of directors of the district consisting of not less than five (5) or more than nine (9) persons who are residents of the county or counties in which the water conservancy district is situated, all of whom shall be owners of real property in said district. The terms of office of said directors shall be staggered over a five (5) year period, but not more than two (2) of such directors may be appointed for a full five (5) year term.

At the expiration of their respective terms of office as fixed by the court, their successors in office shall be elected in the manner provided for the election of irrigation district commissioners in W.S.

41-7-103

,

41-7-104

and

41-7-316

through

41-7-318

, as amended, or as may be amended by the legislature of Wyoming hereafter, except that they shall be elected for a term of five (5) years. The court shall fill all vacancies which may occur at any time on said board, but such court appointees shall only serve until the next succeeding regular election for board members. Each director shall hold office during the term for which he is appointed or elected, and until his successor is duly appointed or elected, and has qualified; and shall furnish a corporate surety bond at the expense of the district; in amount and form fixed and approved by the court, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as such director.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-89.

§ 41-3-741.
Oath; election of officers; seal; records; compensation and expenses.

Each director, before entering upon his official duties, shall take and subscribe to an oath before an officer authorized to administer oaths, that he will support the constitution of the United States and the state of Wyoming and will honestly, faithfully and impartially perform the duties of his office and that he will not be interested directly or indirectly in any contract let by said district, which said oath shall be filed in the office of the clerk of said court in the original case.

Upon taking the oath, the board shall choose one (1) of their number chairman of the board and president of the district, and shall elect some suitable person secretary of the board and of the district, who may or may not be a member of the board. Such board shall adopt a seal and shall keep in a well-bound book a record of all of its proceedings, minutes of all meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by employees and all corporate acts which shall be open to inspection of all owners of property within the district, as well as to all other interested parties.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his service such sum as shall be ordered by the court, not in excess of the sum of six hundred dollars ($600.00) per annum, payable monthly, and necessary traveling expenses actually expended while engaged in the performance of his duties.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-90.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 41-3-742.
Powers generally.

The board shall have power on behalf of said districts:

To have perpetual succession;

To take by appropriation, grant, purchase, bequest, devise or lease, and to hold and enjoy water, water works, water rights and sources of water supply; and any and all real and personal property of any kind within or without the district necessary or convenient to the full exercise of its powers; and to sell, lease, encumber, alien or otherwise, dispose of water, water works, water rights and sources of water supply for use within the district, and any and all real and personal property of any kind within or without the district; also to acquire, construct or operate, control and use any and all works, facilities and means necessary or convenient to the exercise of its power, both within and without the district for the purpose of providing for the use of such water within the district and to do and perform any and all things necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the power herein granted. Title to all rights and property acquired by any water conservancy district organized under this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] shall immediately and by operation of law vest in such district in its corporate name; such property shall be held for the uses and purposes of the district, and shall be exempt from all state, county, municipal, school, and other taxes imposed by any taxing authority of the state of Wyoming;

To have and to exercise the power of eminent domain and in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of private property for public use to take any property necessary to the exercise of the powers herein granted;

To construct and maintain works and establish and maintain facilities across or along any public street or highway, and in, upon, or over any vacant state lands which lands are now, or may become, the property of the state of Wyoming and to construct works and establish and maintain facilities across any stream of water or water course; providing, however, that the district shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be, and shall not use the same in such manner as to completely or unnecessarily impair the usefulness thereof. The grant of the right to use such vacant lands shall be effective upon the filing by such district with the state board of land commissioners of an application showing the boundaries, extent and locations of the lands, rights-of-way, or easements desired for such purposes. If the land, rights-of-way or easements for which application shall be made is for the construction of any aqueduct, ditch, pipeline, conduit, drains, tunnel, or other works for the conveyance of water, or for roads, or for poles or towers, and wires for the conveyance of electrical energy or for telephonic or telegraphic communication no compensation shall be charged the district therefor, unless in the opinion of the state board of land commissioners the construction of such works will render the remainder of the legal subdivision through which such works are to be constructed valueless or unsaleable, in which event the district shall pay for the lands to be taken and for such portion of any legal subdivision which in the opinion of the board is rendered valueless or unsaleable, at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) per acre. If the lands for which application is made are for the purposes other than the construction of roads or works for the conveyance of water, or electricity or telephonic or telegraphic communication, such district shall pay to the state for such lands at the rate of ten dollars ($10.00) per acre. Upon filing such application, accompanied by map or plat showing the location or proposed location of such works and/or facilities, the fee title to so much of such state lands as shall be necessary or convenient to enable such district efficiently and without interference to construct, maintain and operate its works and to establish, maintain and operate its facilities, shall be conveyed to said district by patent. If an easement for right-of-way only over such lands be sought by the district, such easement or right-of-way shall be evidenced by permit or grant executed by or on behalf of the state board of land commissioners. The state board of land commissioners may reserve easements and/or rights-of-way, in the public, across any lands in such patents, grants or permits described for streets, roads and highways theretofore established according to law. Before any such patent, grant or permit shall be executed, any compensation due to the state under the provisions hereof, must be paid. No fee shall be exacted from the district for any patent, permit or grant so issued or for any service rendered hereunder. In the use of streets, the district shall be subject to the reasonable rules and regulations of the county, city or town where such streets lie, concerning excavation and the refilling of excavation, the relaying of pavements and the protection of the public during periods of construction; provided, that the district shall not be required to pay any license or permit fees, or file any bonds. The district may be required to pay reasonable inspection fees;

To contract with the government of the United States or any agency thereof or with an agency of the state of Wyoming for the construction, preservation, operation and maintenance of water supply works, drains, pipelines, tunnels, reservoirs, regulating basins, diversion canals and works, dams, power plants and all necessary works incidental thereto, including supply canals, farm laterals, and distribution and drainage systems of all kinds, and to acquire perpetual rights to the use of water from such works, to sell and dispose of perpetual rights to the use of water from such works to persons and corporations, public and private;

To list in separate ownership the lands within the district which are susceptible of irrigation from district sources and to make an allotment of water to all such lands, which allotment of water shall not exceed the maximum amount of water that the board determines could be beneficially used on such lands; to levy assessments as hereinafter provided, against the lands within the district to which water is allotted on the basis of the value per acre-foot of water allotted to said lands within the district; provided, that the board may divide the district into units and fix a different value per acre-foot of water in the respective units, with due regard to land classification, and in such case shall assess the lands within each unit upon the same basis of value per acre-foot of water allotted to land within such unit;

To fix rates at which water not allotted to lands as hereinbefore provided shall be sold, leased or otherwise disposed of; provided, however, that rates shall be equitable although not necessarily equal or uniform, for like classes of service throughout the district;

To enter into contracts, employ and retain personal services and employ laborers; to create, establish and maintain such offices and positions as shall be necessary and convenient for the transaction of the business of the district; and to elect, appoint and employ such officers, attorneys, agents and employees therefor as shall be found by the board to be necessary and convenient;

To adopt plans and specifications for the works for which the district was organized, which plans and specifications may at any time be changed or modified by the board. Such plans shall include maps, profiles, and such other data and descriptions as may be necessary to set forth the location and character of the works, and a copy thereof shall be kept in the office of the district and open to public inspection;

To appropriate and otherwise acquire water and water rights within or without the state; to develop, store and transport water; to subscribe for, purchase and acquire stock in canal companies, water companies and water users’ associations; to provide, sell, lease, and deliver water for municipal, domestic, transportation, industrial, manufacturing, irrigation, power, recreation, and any and all other beneficial uses and to derive revenue and benefits therefrom; to fix the terms and rates therefor; and to make and adopt plans for and to acquire, construct, operate and maintain irrigation, and water distribution and drainage systems, dams, reservoirs, canals, conduits, pipelines, tunnels, power plants and any and all works, facilities, improvements and property necessary or convenient therefor, and in the doing of all of said things to obligate itself and execute and perform such obligations according to the tenor thereof; provided, however, the sale, leasing and delivery of water for irrigation, domestic, and transportation purposes as hereinbefore provided shall only be made for use within the district;

To invest any surplus money in the district treasury, including such money as may be in any sinking fund established for the purpose of providing for the payment of the principal or interest of any contract, or bonded, or other indebtedness or for any other purpose, not required for the immediate necessities of the district in its own bonds, or in treasury notes or bonds of the United States, or of this state, and such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds or treasury notes, or part thereof, at the original sale of the same, or by the subsequent purchase of such bonds or treasury notes. Any bonds or treasury notes thus purchased and held may, from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds or treasury notes as above provided. Sales of any bonds or treasury notes thus purchased and held shall, from time to time, be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds or treasury notes were originally purchased were placed in the treasury of the district;
(xi) (A) To invest any surplus money in the district treasury, including such money as may be in any sinking fund established for the purpose of providing for the payment of the principal or interest of any contract, or bonded, or other indebtedness or for any other purpose, not required for the immediate necessities of the district in its own bonds, or in treasury notes or bonds of the United States, or of this state, and such investment may be made by direct purchase of any issue of such bonds or treasury notes, or part thereof, at the original sale of the same, or by the subsequent purchase of such bonds or treasury notes. Any bonds or treasury notes thus purchased and held may, from time to time be sold and the proceeds reinvested in bonds or treasury notes as above provided. Sales of any bonds or treasury notes thus purchased and held shall, from time to time, be made in season so that the proceeds may be applied to the purposes for which the money with which the bonds or treasury notes were originally purchased were placed in the treasury of the district;

The functions and duties authorized by subdivision (xi)(A) of this section shall be performed under such rules and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board.

To refund bonded indebtedness incurred by the district under and pursuant to such rules and regulations as shall be prescribed by the board;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness and to issue bonds or other evidence of such indebtedness;

To adopt bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state for carrying on the business, objects and affairs of the board and of the district.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 41-91; Laws 2007, ch. 33, § 1; Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv) substituted “state” for “public” or similar language.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “subdivision (xi)(A) of this section” for “this paragraph” in (a)(xi)(B).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-3-743.
Duties of secretary and chief engineer; other employees.

The secretary shall be custodian of the records of the district and of its corporate seal, and shall assist the board in such particulars as it may direct in the performance of its duties. The secretary shall attest, under the corporate seal of the district, all certified copies of the official records and files of the district that may be required of him by this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], or by any person ordering the same and paying the reasonable cost of transcription, and any portion of the record, so certified and attested shall prima facie import verity. The secretary shall serve also as treasurer of the district, unless a treasurer is otherwise provided for by the board. The board may also employ a chief engineer, who may be an individual, copartnership or corporation; an attorney, and such other engineers, attorneys and other agents and assistants as may needful; and may provide for their compensation which, with all other necessary expenditures, shall be taken as a part of the cost of maintenance of the improvement. The chief engineer shall be superintendent of all the works and improvements, and shall make a full report to the board each year, or oftener if required by the board, and may make such suggestions and recommendations to the board as he may deem proper. The secretary and treasurer and such other agents or employees of the district as the court may direct, shall furnish corporate surety bonds, at the expense of the district, in amount and form fixed and approved by the court, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their respective duties.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-92.

Cross references. —

As to employment of attorneys, agents and employees, see § 41-3-742(a)(viii).

§ 41-3-744.
Quorum.

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum and a concurrence of a majority of those in attendance, in any matter, within their duties, shall be sufficient for its determination, except as otherwise herein provided.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-93.

§ 41-3-745.
Acquisition of rights-of-way.

Whenever, pursuant to this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], the electors of a water conservancy district shall have authorized a contract with the United States for construction and acquisition of works and water rights, which contract shall have obligated the district to acquire rights-of-way therefor to be conveyed by the district to the United States upon reimbursement by the United States, then the district, without further election and through its board of directors, shall have power to do all acts for acquiring such rights-of-way, including borrowing of and paying interest upon, such sums of money as shall be required to make deposits fixed by the court for the possession and to pay awards on condemnation of said rights-of-way as well as amounts up to the appraised values of the particular rights-of-way as shall have been fixed by the appraisers for the United States in each instance of negotiated purchases, notwithstanding the sum borrowed shall be greater than the ordinary annual incomes and revenues of the district.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 41-94.

§ 41-3-746.
Contracts for use of water; power of board to sell or lease water; securing of payments generally.

The board may sell, lease or otherwise dispose of the use of water by term contracts or by contracts for the perpetual use of such water to persons, public corporations, mutual ditch companies, water users’ associations and other private corporations for irrigation or commercial use as shall be provided by contracts, in writing, authorized and entered into by the board; and the board shall require that security be given to secure the payments to be made under such contract or contracts.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 41-95.

§ 41-3-747.
Contracts for use of water; means of owners meeting annual installment payments.

To meet the annual installments as provided in contracts for the use of water:

A water users’ association may bind itself to levy an annual assessment on the use of water and to secure same by liens on land and water rights or in such manner as may be provided by law;

Mutual ditch or irrigation company may bind itself by mortgage upon its irrigation works and system and/or to levy annual assessments upon its stockholders; and

Any person or corporation landowner may create a mortgage lien upon lands and/or give other security satisfactory to the board; and all such contracts shall provide for forfeiture of the use of water for nonpayment of assessments and/or installments in the same manner and procedure as provided by statute for forfeiture of stock in a mutual ditch company.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 41-96.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-3-748.
Surplus funds.

Whenever a contract of indebtedness has been created by the district, it shall be lawful for the board to make the annual levy of taxes and special assessments in such amount as will create a surplus of funds to meet the annual installments of indebtedness and/or the payment of bonds and interest, and the necessary maintenance and operating charges, and the board shall cause such surplus funds to be placed in a sinking fund which may be used for the payments of contingencies, defaults and delinquencies, and to pay the future annual installments of indebtedness on contract and/or bonds and interest.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 41-97.

§ 41-3-749.
Use and distribution of water generally.

The board shall have the following powers concerning the management, control, delivery, use and distribution of water by the district, to wit:

To make and enforce all reasonable rules and regulations for the management, control, delivery, use and distribution of water;

To withhold the delivery of water upon which there are any defaults or delinquencies of payment;

To provide for and declare forfeitures of rights to the use of water upon default or failure to comply with any order, contract or agreement for the purchase, lease or use of water and to resell, lease or otherwise dispose of water upon which forfeiture has been declared;

To allocate and reallocate the use of water to lands within the district;

To provide for and grant the right, upon terms, to transfer water from lands to which water has been allocated to other lands within the district and to discharged liens from lands to which the same was theretofore attached and to create liens, as provided in this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

], upon lands to which the use of such water is transferred.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 41-98.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-3-750.
Allotment of water to landowner under disability.

Where the landowner in a water conservancy district, organized under this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] is under disability by reason of infancy, insanity or otherwise, or lands are held under administration, executorship, guardianship, conservatorship, trusteeship, receivership or other similar proceeding, the administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, trustee, receiver or other like officer shall be considered the “landowner” for all purposes within the terms of this act, and when authorized by the court having jurisdiction of the estate or lands, such administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, trustee, receiver or other like officer may petition for an allotment of water, in such quantity as determined by such court, as will, together with the present supply of water for irrigation purposes make an adequate supply for the irrigation of such lands; or in the event such administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, trustee, receiver or other like officer has heretofore petitioned for a supply of water for irrigation of lands so held as aforesaid, the court having jurisdiction of the estate or lands, may ratify or confirm the petition for such quantity of water as it may determine will make an adequate supply for the irrigation of such lands, and such petition so made and authorized or ratified and confirmed as aforesaid shall have the same effect and be binding upon all parties interested in such lands to the same extent as though made by a “landowner” while not under disability.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 30: W.S. 1957, § 41-99.

§ 41-3-751.
District boundary changes.

The boundaries of any district organized under the provision of this act [§§

41-3-701

through

41-3-779

] may be changed in the manner herein prescribed, but the change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or to property, or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever; nor shall it affect or impair or discharge any contract, obligation, lien or charge for or upon which it might be liable or chargeable had such change of boundaries not been made. The owners of lands may file with the board a petition, in writing, praying that such lands be included in the district. The petition shall describe the tracts or body of land owned by the petitioners, and such petition shall be deemed to give assent of the petitioners to the inclusion in said district of the lands described in the petition, and such petition must be acknowledged in the same manner that conveyances of land are required to be acknowledged. The secretary of the board shall cause notice of filing of such petition to be given and published in the county in which the lands are situated, which notice shall state the filing of such petition, names of petitioners, descriptions of lands mentioned and the prayer of said petitioners; giving notice to all persons interested to appear at the office of the board at the time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted. The board shall at the time and place mentioned or at such time or times at which the hearing may be adjourned, proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause why said petition should not be granted. The failure of any person interested to show cause, in writing, shall be deemed and held and taken as an assent on his part to the inclusion of such lands in the district as prayed for in the petition. If the petition be granted, the board shall make an order to that effect and file same with the clerk of the court and upon order of the court said lands shall be included in the district.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 41-100.

§ 41-3-752.
Petition for exclusion of lands.

The owner or owners in fee of any lands constituting a portion of the district may file with the board a petition praying that such lands be excluded and taken from said district. Petitions shall describe the lands which the petitioners desire to have excluded. Such petition must be acknowledged in the same manner and form as required in case of a conveyance of land and be accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all costs of the exclusion proceedings. The secretary of the board shall cause a notice of filing of such petition to be published in the county in which said lands, or the major portion thereof, are located. The notice shall state the filing of such petition, the names of petitioners, descriptions of lands mentioned in said petition, and the prayer of said petitioners; and it shall notify all persons interested to appear at the office of said board at the time named in said notice, showing cause in writing, if any they have, why said petition should not be granted. The board at the time named in said notice, or at the time or times at which the hearing of said petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all objections thereto, presented, in writing, by any person showing cause as aforesaid, why the prayer of the petition should not be granted. The filing of such petition shall be deemed and taken as an assent by each and all such petitioners to the exclusion from the district of the lands mentioned in the petition, or any part thereof. The board, if they deem it not for the best interests of the district that the lands mentioned in the petition, or portion thereof, shall be excluded from the district, shall order that said petition be denied, but if they deem it for the best interest of the district that the lands mentioned in the petition, or some portion thereof, be excluded from the district, and if there are no outstanding bonds of the district, then the board may order the lands mentioned in the petition or some portion thereof, to be excluded from the district. Provided, further, that in case a contract has been made between the district and the United States or any agency thereof, no change shall be made in the boundaries of the district unless the secretary of the interior shall assent thereto in writing and such assent be filed with the board. Upon such assent, any lands excluded from the district shall upon order of the court be discharged from all liens in favor of the United States under the contract with the United States or under bonds deposited with its agents. Upon allowance of such petition, the board shall file a certified copy of the order of the board making such change with the clerk of the court and upon order of the court said lands shall be excluded from the district.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 41-101.

§ 41-3-753.
Bonds; authority of board to issue; purpose; terms; execution; tax exemptions.

To pay for construction, operation and maintenance of the works and expenses preliminary and incidental thereto, the board is hereby authorized to enter into contract with the United States or an agency thereof, providing for payment in installments or to issue negotiable bonds of the district. If bonds are authorized, the same shall bear interest payable semiannually and shall be due and payable not less than ten (10) nor more than fifty (50) years from their dates. The form, terms and provisions of bonds, provisions for their payment and conditions for their retirement and calling, not inconsistent with law, shall be vested and determined by the board and they shall be issued as hereinafter provided in payment of the works, equipment, expenses and interest during the period of construction. Bonds shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the president of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Bonds shall be in denominations as the board determines and shall be payable to the bearer and may be registered in the office of the county treasurer of the county wherein the organization of the district has been effected, with the interest coupons payable to bearer, which shall bear the facsimile signature of the president of the board. The bonds are exempt from all state, county, municipal, school and other taxes imposed by any taxing authority of the state of Wyoming and shall not be sold at less than par and accrued interest.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 41-102; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 34; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 41-3-754.
Bonds; election prior to issuance generally.

Whenever the board incorporated under this act shall by resolution adopted by a majority of the said board, determine that the interests of said district and the public interest or necessity demand the acquisition, construction or completion of any source of water supply, water works, or other improvements, or facility, or the making of any contract with the United States or other persons or corporation, to carry out the objects or purposes of said district, wherein the indebtedness or obligation shall be created, to satisfy which shall require a greater expenditure than the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district shall permit, said board shall order the submission of the proposition of insuring the obligation or bonded or other indebtedness for the purposes set forth in said resolution, to the qualified electors of the district as shall have paid a tax on property in the district in the year preceding the election, at an election held for that purpose. Any election held for the purpose of submitting any proposition or propositions of incurring the obligation or indebtedness shall be held at an election as permitted for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

. The declaration of public interest or necessity herein required and the provision for the holding of the election may be included within one (1) and the same resolution, which resolution, in addition to the declaration of public interest or necessity shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the works or improvements, as the case may be, the amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness. The resolution shall also recite the date upon which the election shall be held and the manner of holding the same and the method of voting for or against the incurring of the proposed indebtedness. The resolution shall also fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the election and shall designate the precincts and polling places and shall appoint for each polling place, the officers of the election, which officers shall be registered electors and shall consist of three (3) judges, one (1) of whom shall act as clerk, who shall constitute a board of election for each polling place. The description of precincts may be made by reference to any order or orders of the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the district or any part thereof is situated or by reference to any previous order, or resolution of the board or by detailed description of the precincts. Precincts established by the boards of the various counties may be consolidated for special elections held hereunder. In the event any election under this section shall be called to be held concurrently with any other election or shall be consolidated therewith, the resolution calling the election hereunder need not designate precincts or polling places or the names of officers of election, but shall contain reference to the act or order calling the other election and fixing the precincts and polling places and appointing election officers.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 41-103; Laws 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2.

§ 41-3-755.
Bonds; election prior to issuance; publication of resolution.

The resolution provided in W.S.

41-3-754

shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, the last publication of which shall be at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for said election, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, and no other or further notice of such election or publication of the names of election officers or of the precincts or polling places need be given or made.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 41-104.

§ 41-3-756.
Bonds; election prior to issuance; conduct of election; canvassing of returns; declaration of results.

The respective election boards shall conduct the election in their respective precincts in the manner prescribed by law for the holding of general elections, and shall make their returns to the secretary of the district. At any regular or special meeting of the board held not earlier than five (5) days following the date of such election, the returns thereof, shall be canvassed and the results thereof declared. In the event that any election held hereunder shall be consolidated with any primary or general election, the returns thereof shall be made and canvassed at the time and in the manner provided by law for the canvass of the returns of such primary or general election. It shall be the duty of such canvassing body or bodies to promptly certify and transmit to the board a statement of the results of the vote upon the proposition submitted thereunder. Upon receipt of such certificate, it shall be the duty of the board to tabulate and declare the results of the election held thereunder.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 41-105.

§ 41-3-757.
Bonds; election prior to issuance; approval.

In the event that it shall appear from said returns that a majority of said qualified electors of the district who shall have voted on any proposition submitted hereunder at such election voted in favor of such proposition, the district shall thereupon be authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, enter into such contract, and/or issue and sell such bonds of the district, all for the purpose or purposes and object or objects provided for in the proposition submitted hereunder, and the resolution therefor, and in the amount so provided and at a rate of interest not exceeding the rate of interest recited in such resolution. Submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent election or elections called for such purpose.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 41-106.

§ 41-3-758.
Judicial examination and determination of board's powers.

The board may, in its discretion, at any time file a petition in the court, praying a judicial examination and determination of any power conferred hereby or by any amendment hereto or of any tax or assessment levied or of any act, proceeding or contract of the district, whether or not said contract shall have been executed, including proposed contracts for the acquisition, construction, maintenance and/or operation of works for the district. Such petition shall set forth the facts whereon the validity of such power, assessment, act, proceeding or contract is founded and shall be verified by the president of the board. Notice of the filing of said petition shall be given by the clerk of the court, under the seal thereof, stating in brief outline the contents of the petition and showing where a full copy of any contract or contracts, therein mentioned, may be examined. Said notice shall be served by publication in at least five (5) consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the principal office of the district is located, and by posting the same in the office of the district at least thirty (30) days prior to the date fixed in said notice for the hearing on said petition. Any owner of property in the district or person interested in the contract or proposed contract may appear and demur to or answer said petition at any time prior to the date fixed for said hearing or within such further time as may be allowed by the court; and the petition shall be taken as confessed by all persons who fail so to appear. The said petition and notice shall be sufficient to give the court jurisdiction and upon hearing, the court shall examine into and determine all matters and things affecting the question submitted, shall make such findings, with reference thereto, and render such judgment and decree thereon as the case warrants. Costs may be divided or apportioned among the contesting parties in the discretion of the trial court. Review of the judgment of the court may be had as in other similar cases, except that such review must be applied for within thirty (30) days after the time of the rendition of such judgment, or within such additional time as may be allowed by the court within thirty (30) days. The Code of Civil Procedure [title 1] shall govern in matters of pleading and practice where not otherwise specified herein. The court shall disregard any error, irregularity or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 101, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 41-107.